fr: Focus sur l’industrie: Automobile; Éducation; Finance; Pour la santé; Fabrication; Marketing; Commerce de détail; Autre
hu: Iparági fókusz: Autóipar; Oktatás; Pénzügy; Egészségügy; Gyártás; Marketing; Kiskereskedelem; Egyéb
zh-CN: 行业聚焦: 汽车主题; 教育; 金融; 医疗; 制造业; 营销; 零售业; 其他
ru: Отрасль: Автомобили; Образование; Финансы; Здравоохранение; Производство; Маркетинг; Розничная торговля; Другая
pt-BR: Foco na indústria: Automotivo; Educação; Finança; Saúde; Manufatura; Marketing; Varejo; Outro
es: Enfoque de la industria: Automóviles; Educación; Finanzas; Cuidado de la salud; Fabricación; Márketing; Venta al por menor; Otros
nb: Bransjefokus: Kjøretøy; Utdanning; Finans; Helsevesen; Produksjon; Markedsføring; Detaljhandel; Annen
it: Focus del settore: Settore automobilistico; Istruzione; Finanziario; Sanitario; Produzione; Marketing; Negozi; Altro
fi: Toimialan painopiste: Autoilu; Koulutus; Finanssi; Terveydenhuolto; Tuotanto; Markkinointi; Jälleenmyynti; Muu
lt-LT: Tikslinė veiklos sritis: Automobiliai; Švietimas; Finansai; Sveikatos priežiūra; Gamyba; Rinkodara; Mažmeninė prekyba; Kita
ja: 重点業界: 自動車; 教育; 金融; 健康管理; 製造; マーケティング; 小売; その他
pt-PT: Foco da indústria: Automóveis; Educação; Finanças; Assistência médica; Fabrico; Marketing; Retalho; Outro
tr: Endüstri odağı: Otomotiv; Eğitim; Finans; Sağlık; İmalat; Pazarlama; Perakende; Diğer
sl-SI: Osredotočenost na industrijo: Avtomobilizem; Izobraževanje; Finance; Zdravstvo; Proizvodnja; Trženje; Maloprodaja; Drugo
en: Industry focus: Automotive; Education; Finance; Healthcare; Manufacturing; Marketing; Retail; Other
vi: Trọng tâm ngành: Máy móc tự động; Giáo dục; Tài chính; Chăm sóc sức khỏe; Sản xuất; Tiếp thị; Bán lẻ; Khác
zh-TW: 產業聚焦: 汽車; 教育; 金融; 衛生保健; 製造業; 行銷; 零售; 其他
bg-BG: Целеви отрасъл: Автомобили; Образование; Финанси; Здравеопазване; Производство; Маркетинг; Търговия на дребно; Други
el: Εστίαση στη βιομηχανία: Αυτοκίνητα; Εκπαίδευση; Οικονομικά; Υγειονομική περίθαλψη; Βιομηχανική παραγωγή; Μάρκετινγκ; Λιανικό εμπόριο; Άλλο
sv: Branschfokus: Bil; Utbildning; Finans; Hälso- och sjukvård; Tillverkning; Marknadsföring; Detaljhandel; Annat
cs: Zaměření na průmysl: Automobily; Vzdělání; Finance; Zdravotnictví; Výroba; Marketing; Prodejny; Jiné
pl: Koncentracja na branży: Motoryzacyjny; Edukacja; Finanse; Opieka zdrowotna; Produkcja; Marketing; Sprzedaż detaliczna; Pozostałe
de: Branchenschwerpunkt: Automobil; Bildung; Finanzwesen; Gesundheitswesen; Herstellung; Marketing; Einzelhandel; Sonstiges
th: มุ่งเน้นอุตสาหกรรม: ยานยนต์; การศึกษา; การเงิน; ดูแลสุขภาพ; การผลิต; การตลาด; การค้าปลีก; อื่นๆ
ko: 산업 초점: 자동차; 교육; 재정; 보건 의료; 제조; 마케팅; 소매; 기타
hr-HR: Ciljni gospodarski sektor: Automobilizam; Obrazovanje; Financije; Zdravstvo; Proizvodnja; Marketing; Maloprodaja; Ostalo
sk-SK: Priemyselné zameranie: Automobilový; Vzdelávanie; Financie; Zdravotníctvo; Výroba; Marketing; Maloobchodný; Iné
nl: Industrie-focus: Automobiel; Onderwijs; Financiën; Gezondheidszorg; Productie; Marketing; Retail; Andere
da: Branchefokus: Biler; Uddannelse; Finans; Sundhed; Produktion; Marketing; Detail; Andet
ro-RO: Sector de activitate vizat: Automobile; Educație; Finanțe; Sănătate; Producție; Marketing; Retail; Altele